Hawaii statutes.
§237-6 "Contractor",
"contracting", "federal cost-plus contractor", defined.
"Contracting" means the business activities of a contractor.

"Contractor" includes, for purposes
of this chapter:

(1) Every person engaging in the business of
contracting to erect, construct, repair, or improve buildings or structures, of
any kind or description, including any portion thereof, or to make any
installation therein, or to make, construct, repair, or improve any highway,
road, street, sidewalk, ditch, excavation, fill, bridge, shaft, well, culvert,
sewer, water system, drainage system, dredging or harbor improvement project,
electric or steam rail, lighting or power system, transmission line, tower,
dock, wharf, or other improvements;

(2) Every person engaging in the practice of
architecture, professional engineering, land surveying, and landscape
architecture, as defined in section 464-1; and

(3) Every person engaged in the practice of pest
control or fumigation as a pest control operator as defined in section 460J-1.

"Federal cost-plus contractor" means
a contractor having a contract with the United States or an instrumentality
thereof, excluding national banks, where, by the terms of the contract, the
United States or such instrumentality, excluding national banks, agrees to
reimburse the contractor for the cost of material, plant, or equipment used in
the performance of the contract and for taxes which the contractor may be
required to pay with respect to such material, plant, or equipment, whether the
contractor's profit is computed in the form of a fixed fee or on a percentage
basis; and also means a subcontractor under such a contract, who also operates
on a cost-plus basis. [L 1935, c 141, pt of §1; am L 1941, c 265, §1(b); am L
1943, c 81, §1(a); RL 1945, §5448; RL 1955, §117-7; am L 1965, c 201, §36; HRS
§237-6; am L 1971, c 4, §1 and c 204, §3; am L 1984, c 60, §1; am L 2000, c
198, §2]

Case Notes

"Structures" does not include boats and vessels,
and taxpayer engaged in repair of marine vessels is not a
"contractor". 55 H. 572, 524 P.2d 890.

Cited: 44 H. 584, 587, 358 P.2d 539.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next